New York, session 2025-2026, S1118.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 2801-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 2801-c. School resource officer working group. 1. The commissioner 4 shall establish a working group to study appropriate standards and 5 training for a person to serve as a school resource officer. 6 2. Such working group shall include: the commissioner, the commission- 7 er of the division of criminal justice services, the superintendent of 8 state police, a representative from the New York state sheriffs' associ- 9 ation, one member of the municipal police training council selected by 10 the governor, one member of the municipal police training council 11 selected by the temporary president of the senate, and one member of the 12 municipal police training council selected by the speaker of the assem- 13 bly. 14 3. Such working group shall meet regularly and shall study the options 15 and best practices available and make recommendations for: 16 a. the need and appropriateness of physical fitness standards, age 17 limitations and training requirements for school resource officers and 18 which agency or organization would be responsible for creating and 19 implementing such standards and requirements; 20 b. the appropriateness and availability of sensitivity training for 21 school resource officers which prepares such officers to interact with 22 school-aged children and which agencies or organizations could offer 23 such training; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03500-01-5 S. 1118 2 1 c. the civil service and benefit ramifications of any proposed stand- 2 ards, if any, as well as potential fiscal ramifications on school 3 districts. 4 4. The working group created by subdivision one of this section shall 5 report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the legisla- 6 ture no later than six months after the effective date of this section. 7 Such report shall be bound and made available to the public. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 9 deemed repealed nine months after the school resource officer working 10 group reports its findings and recommendations to the governor and the 11 legislature pursuant to section 2801-c of the education law as added by 12 section one of this act; provided that the commissioner of education 13 shall notify the legislative bill drafting commission upon the occur- 14 rence of the enactment of the legislation provided for in section one of 15 this act in order that the commission may maintain an accurate and time- 16 ly effective data base of the official text of the laws of the state of 17 New York in furtherance of effectuating the provisions of section 44 of 18 the legislative law and section 70-b of the public officers law.